New York, session 2025-2026, S4951.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to 2 the contrary, a school district shall provide educational services in 3 the 2025-2026 school year to a student who turned twenty-one years old 4 during the 2024-2025 school year and was enrolled in the school district 5 and receiving special education services pursuant to an individualized 6 education program. Such student may continue to receive such educational 7 services until the student completes the services pursuant to the indi- 8 vidualized education program or the end of the school year during which 9 the student turns twenty-two years old, whichever is sooner. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 11 deemed repealed June 30, 2026. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04282-01-5